Wyoming, session 2026, SF0122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 26-40-201(d) and (m)(intro) is
amended to read:

26-40-201. Payment of claims under medical necessity
standard; review.
SF0122

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0506

(d) A claimant shall have not less than thirty (30)
days in which to file a request for the review provided in
subsection (c) of this section and such review shall be
completed by the insurer, and a decision delivered to the
claimant, no not later than forty-five (45) twenty-one (21)
days after receipt of a request for review.

(m) Within forty-five (45) Not later than twenty-one
(21) days after the date of receipt of the request for
external review, the assigned independent review
organization shall provide written notice to the claimant,
the insurer and the commissioner of its decision to uphold
or reverse the decision of the insurer that the provision
of or payment for medical services, procedures or supplies
requested by the claimant are not medically necessary.
Such written notice shall include:

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0122